Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-2252.01
Probation administrator; report required.

On January 15 and July 15 of each fiscal year, the administrator shall provide a report to the budget division of the Department of Administrative Services, the Legislative Fiscal Analyst, and the Supreme Court which shall include, but not be limited to:

(1) The total number of felony cases supervised by the office in the previous six months for both regular and intensive supervision probation;

(2) The total number of misdemeanor cases supervised by the office in the previous six months for both regular and intensive supervision probation;

(3) The felony caseload per officer for both regular and intensive supervision probation on the last day of the reporting period;

(4) The misdemeanor caseload per officer for both regular and intensive supervision probation on the last day of the reporting period;

(5) The total number of juvenile cases supervised by the office in the previous six months for both regular and intensive supervision probation;

(6) The total number of predisposition investigations completed by the office in the previous six months;

(7) The total number of presentence investigations completed by the office in the previous six months;

(8) The total number of juvenile intake screening interviews conducted and detentions authorized by the office in the previous six months, using the detention screening instrument described in section 43-260.01; and

(9) The total number of probationers with restitution judgments, the number of restitution payments made to clerks of the court, the average amount of payments, and the total amount of restitution collected.

The report submitted to the Legislative Fiscal Analyst shall be submitted electronically.

Laws 1990, LB 220, § 4;

Laws 2001, LB 451, § 2;

Laws 2012, LB782, § 33;

Laws 2015, LB605, § 65;

Laws 2016, LB1094, § 13.